Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-910.09
Unit or cooperative development; commission order not to result in transfer of title.

Except to the extent that the parties affected so agree, no commission order shall be construed to result in a transfer of all or any part of the title of any person to the oil and gas rights in any tract in the unit area.

Laws 1965, c. 343, § 10, p. 980.